Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-3802
Notice of untried charges and rights; director; duties.

The director shall promptly inform in writing each prisoner in the custody of the Department of Correctional Services of the source and nature of any untried indictment, information, or complaint against him or her of which the director has knowledge and of his or her right to make a request for final disposition thereof.

Laws 1984, LB 591, § 2.

Where the prisoner has actual knowledge of the pending charge, this section is deemed satisfied. State v. Tucker, 259 Neb. 225, 609 N.W.2d 306 (2000).